en: Computer Circuit Boards
xx: Computer Circuit Boards
cs: Desky s plošnými spoji pro počítače
da: Printkort til computere
de: Computer-Leiterplatten
es: Placas de circuitos para ordenadores
fr: Circuits imprimés pour ordinateurs
it: Circuiti stampati per computer
ja: コンピューター用回路基板
nl: Printplaten voor computers
no: Kretskort til datamaskiner
pl: Obwody drukowane do komputerów
pt: Placas de circuito para computadores
ru: Печатные платы для компьютеров
sv: Kretskort för datorer
tr: Bilgisayar Devre Kartları

en: Computer Inverter Boards
xx: Computer Inverter Boards
cs: Invertory pro počítače
da: Invertere til computere
de: Computer-Inverterplatine
es: Placas inversoras para ordenadores
fr: Carte onduleur pour ordinateurs
it: Schede inverter per computer
ja: コンピューター用インバータボード
nl: Inverterkaarten voor computers
no: Inverterkort til datamaskiner
pl: Inwertery do komputerów
pt: Placas de inversor
ru: Платы инвертеров для компьютеров
sv: Inverterkort för datorer
tr: Bilgisayar İnvertör Kartları

en: Hard Drive Circuit Boards
xx: Hard Drive Circuit Boards
cs: Desky s plošnými spoji pro pevné disky
da: Invertere til harddiske
de: Festplatten-Leiterplatten
es: Placas de circuitos para discos duros
fr: Circuits imprimés de disques durs
it: Circuiti stampati per hard disk
ja: ハードドライブ用回路基板
nl: Printplaten voor vaste schijven
no: Kretskort til harddisker
pl: Obwody drukowane do dysków twardych
pt: Placas de circuito para discos rígidos
ru: Печатные платы для жестких дисков
sv: Kretskort för hårddiskar
tr: Sabit Disk Devre Kartları

en: Motherboards
xx: Motherboards
cs: Základní desky
da: Bundkort
de: Motherboards
es: Placas madre
fr: Cartes mères
it: Schede madre
ja: マザーボード
nl: Moederborden
no: Hovedkort
pl: Płyty główne
pt: Placas-mãe
ru: Материнские платы
sv: Moderkort
tr: Ana Kartlar

en: Development Boards
xx: Development Boards
cs: Vývojové desky
da: Udviklingskort
de: Entwicklungsboard
es: Placa de desarrollo
fr: Cartes de développement
it: Schede di sviluppo
ja: 開発ボード
nl: Ontwikkelborden
no: Utviklingskort
pl: Płytki rozwojowe
pt: Placas de desenvolvimento
ru: Платы для прототипирования
sv: Utvecklingskort
tr: Geliştirme Kartları

en: Exercise Machine Circuit Boards
xx: Exercise Machine Circuit Boards
cs: Desky s plošnými spoji pro posilovací stroje
da: Printkort til træningsmaskiner
de: Leiterplatten für Fitnessgeräte
es: Placas de circuitos para aparatos de ejercicio
fr: Circuits imprimés pour machines de fitness
it: Circuiti stampati per macchine per l'esercizio fisico
ja: 運動器具用回路基板
nl: Printplaten voor fitnessapparaten
no: Kretskort til treningsmaskiner
pl: Obwody drukowane do urządzeń do ćwiczeń
pt: Placas de circuito para aparelhos de ginástica
ru: Печатные платы для спортивных тренажеров
sv: Kretskort för träningsmaskiner
tr: Egzersiz Makinesi Devre Kartları

en: Household Appliance Circuit Boards
xx: Household Appliance Circuit Boards
cs: Desky s plošnými spoji pro domácí spotřebiče
da: Printkort til husholdningsapparater
de: Leiterplatten für Haushaltsgeräte
es: Placas de circuitos para electrodomésticos
fr: Circuits imprimés pour électroménager
it: Circuiti stampati per elettrodomestici
ja: 家電用回路基板
nl: Printplaten voor huishoudelijke apparaten
no: Kretskort til husholdningsapparater
pl: Obwody drukowane do domowych urządzeń elektrycznych
pt: Placas de circuito para eletrodomésticos
ru: Печатные платы для бытовых приборов
sv: Kretskort för hushållsapparater
tr: Ev Aleti Devre Kartları

en: Pool & Spa Circuit Boards
xx: Pool & Spa Circuit Boards
cs: Desky s plošnými spoji pro bazény a vířivky
da: Printkort til swimmingpools og spabade
de: Leiterplatten für Pools und Spas
es: Placas de circuitos para piscinas y spa
fr: Circuits imprimés pour piscines et spas
it: Circuiti stampati per piscine e spa
ja: プール・スパ用回路基板
nl: Printplaten voor zwembaden en spa's
no: Kretskort til basseng og spa
pl: Obwody drukowane do basenów i spa
pt: Placas de circuito para piscina e spa
ru: Печатные платы для бассейнов и джакузи
sv: Kretskort för pool och spa
tr: Havuz ve Spa Devre Kartları

en: Printer\, Copier\, & Fax Machine Circuit Boards
xx: Printer\, Copier\, & Fax Machine Circuit Boards
cs: Desky s plošnými spoji pro tiskárny\, kopírky a faxy
da: Printkort til printere\, kopimaskiner og faxmaskiner
de: Leiterplatten für Drucker\, Kopierer & Faxgeräte
es: Placas de circuitos para máquinas impresoras\, fotocopiadoras y fax
fr: Circuits imprimés pour imprimantes\, copieurs et télécopieurs
it: Circuiti stampati per stampanti\, fotocopiatrici e fax
ja: プリンター・コピー機用回路基板
nl: Printplaten voor printers\, kopieermachines en faxapparaten
no: Kretskort til skrivere\, kopierings- og faksmaskiner
pl: Obwody drukowane do drukarek\, kopiarek i faksów
pt: Placas de circuito para impressoras\, copiadoras e aparelhos de fax
ru: Печатные платы для принтеров\, копиров и факсов
sv: Kretskort för skrivare\, kopiator och faxmaskin
tr: Yazıcı\, Fotokopi ve Faks Makinesi Devre Kartları

en: Scanner Circuit Boards
xx: Scanner Circuit Boards
cs: Desky s plošnými spoji pro skenery
da: Printkort til scannere
de: Leiterplatten für Scanner
es: Placas de circuitos para escáneres
fr: Circuits imprimés pour scanners
it: Circuiti stampati per scanner
ja: スキャナー用回路基板
nl: Printplaten voor scanners
no: Kretskort til skannere
pl: Obwody drukowane do skanerów
pt: Placas de circuito para scanners
ru: Печатные платы для сканеров
sv: Kretskort för skanner
tr: Tarayıcı Devre Kartları

en: Television Circuit Boards
xx: Television Circuit Boards
cs: Desky s plošnými spoji pro televizory
da: Printkort til fjernsyn
de: Leiterplatten für Fernsehgeräte
es: Placas de circuitos para televisores
fr: Circuits imprimés pour TV
it: Circuiti stampati per televisori
ja: テレビ用回路基板
nl: Printplaten voor televisies
no: TV-kretskort
pl: Obwody drukowane do telewizorów
pt: Placas de circuito para televisão
ru: Печатные платы для телевизоров
sv: Kretskort för TV-apparater
tr: Televizyon Devre Kartları

en: Semiconductors
xx: Semiconductors
cs: Polovodiče
da: Halvledere
de: Halbleiter
es: Semiconductores
fr: Semi-conducteurs
it: Semiconduttori
ja: 半導体
nl: Halfgeleiders
no: Halvledere
pl: Półprzewodniki
pt: Semicondutores
ru: Полупроводники
sv: Halvledare
tr: Yarıiletkenler

en: Diodes
xx: Diodes
cs: Diody
da: Dioder
de: Dioden
es: Diodos
fr: Diodes
it: Diodi
ja: ダイオード
nl: Diodes
no: Dioder
pl: Diody
pt: Diodos
ru: Диоды
sv: Dioder
tr: Diyotlar

en: Integrated Circuits & Chips
xx: Integrated Circuits & Chips
cs: Integrované obvody a čipy
da: Integrerede kredsløb og chips
de: Integrierte Schaltkreise & Chips
es: Chips y circuitos integrados
fr: Puces et circuits intégrés
it: Chip e circuiti integrati
ja: 集積回路・チップ
nl: Geïntegreerde schakelingen en chips
no: Integrerte kretser og brikker
pl: Układy scalone
pt: Chips e circuitos integrados
ru: Интегральные схемы и чипы
sv: Integrerade kretsar och chips
tr: Entegre Devreler ve Çipler

en: Microcontrollers
xx: Microcontrollers
cs: Mikrořadiče
da: Mikrokontroller
de: Mikrocontroller
es: Microcontroladores
fr: Microcontrôleurs
it: Microcontroller
ja: マイクロコントローラー
nl: Microcontrollers
no: Mikrokontrollere
pl: Mikrokontrolery
pt: Microcontroladores
ru: Микроконтроллеры
sv: Mikrokontroller
tr: Mikrodenetleyiciler

en: Transistors
xx: Transistors
cs: Tranzistory
da: Transistorer
de: Transistoren
es: Transistores
fr: Transistors
it: Transistor
ja: トランジスタ
nl: Transistoren
no: Transistorer
pl: Tranzystory
pt: Transistores
ru: Транзисторы
sv: Transistorer
tr: Transistörler

en: Communications
xx: Communications
cs: Komunikace
da: Kommunikation
de: Kommunikationsgeräte
es: Comunicación
fr: Communications
it: Comunicazioni
ja: 通信機器
nl: Communicatie
no: Kommunikasjon
pl: Telekomunikacja
pt: Comunicações
ru: Связь
sv: Kommunikation
tr: Haberleşme

en: Answering Machines
xx: Answering Machines
cs: Záznamníky
da: Telefonsvarere
de: Anrufbeantworter
es: Contestadores automáticos
fr: Répondeurs
it: Segreterie telefoniche
ja: 留守番電話
nl: Antwoordapparaten
no: Telefonsvarere
pl: Automatyczne sekretarki
pt: Secretárias eletrônicas
ru: Автоответчики
sv: Telefonsvarare
tr: Telesekreterler

en: Caller IDs
xx: Caller IDs
cs: Identifikátory volajícího
da: Opkalds-id'er
de: Anruferkennung
es: Identificadores de llamada
fr: Identification de l'appelant
it: Identificazione chiamante
ja: 発信者番号通知
nl: Beller-identificatiesystemen
no: Nummervisere
pl: Identyfikatory dzwoniącego
pt: Identificadores de chamada
ru: Определители для телефонов
sv: Nummerpresentatörer
tr: Arayan Numarayı Gösteren Cihazlar

en: Communication Radio Accessories
xx: Communication Radio Accessories
cs: Radiokomunikační příslušenství
da: Kommunikationsradio – tilbehør
de: Funkzubehör
es: Accesorios para sistemas de comunicación por radio
fr: Accessoires de communication par radio
it: Accessori comunicazioni radio
ja: 無線通信関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor communicatieradio's
no: Tilbehør til kommunikasjonsradioer
pl: Akcesoria do komunikacji radiowej
pt: Acessórios para rádio de comunicação
ru: Принадлежности для радиосистем
sv: Tillbehör till kommunikationsradio
tr: İletişim Telsizi Aksesuarları